Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 8

Deposit Insurance

45-2-801. Membership in federal deposit insurance corporation authorized.

Any state bank is empowered, on the authority of its board of directors or the majority of the board, and with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts, incur obligations and generally to do and perform any and all acts and things whatsoever necessary or appropriate in order to take advantage of any and all memberships, loans, subscriptions, contracts, grants, rights or privileges that may at any time be available or inure to banking institutions or to their depositors, creditors, stockholders, conservators, receivers or liquidators, by virtue of those provisions of § 8 the Federal Banking Act of 1933, § 12B of the Federal Reserve Act, which established the federal deposit insurance corporation, and in order to provide for the insurance of deposits or to take advantage of any other provisions of that or any other act or resolution of congress to aid, regulate or safeguard banking institutions or their depositors, including any amendments or substitutions; and to subscribe for and acquire any stock debentures or other types of insurance of the federal deposit insurance corporation and to comply with all lawful regulations and requirements from time to time issued or made by that corporation.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-501.

Compiler's Notes. Section 8 of the Federal Banking Act of 1933, and § 12B of the Federal Reserve Act, are found in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1811-1831.

Cross-References. Applicability of part to industrial banks for thrift certificate purposes, §45-5-604.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Trustees and guardians, investment of funds in certificates of deposit and saving accounts where insured, §35-3-114.

45-2-802. Appointment of federal deposit insurance corporation as receiver of state bank — Powers and duties.

The federal deposit insurance corporation may be appointed receiver of any state bank, the deposits in which are to any extent insured by that corporation and that has been closed on account of inability to meet the demands of its depositors, or otherwise by the law of Tennessee.

The commissioner, after taking possession of a state bank, shall have the right to appoint the federal deposit insurance corporation as receiver.

Upon acceptance of the appointment as receiver, the federal deposit insurance corporation shall not be required to post bond or security.

If the corporation accepts the appointment, it shall have and possess all of the duties, powers, and privileges provided by the laws of this state with respect to receivers of closed banks, except insofar as the duties, powers, and privileges are in conflict with the Federal Deposit Insurance Act. In addition, the federal deposit insurance corporation as receiver shall have the right to make an emergency sale of assets of a closed bank, as provided in part 15 of this chapter.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-502; Acts 1980, ch. 510, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Deposit Insurance Act referred to above is compiled in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1811-1832.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-2-803. Subrogation rights of federal deposit insurance corporation on payment of insured deposits.

Whenever any state bank is closed and the federal deposit insurance corporation has paid or made available for payment the insured deposit liabilities of the closed institution, the corporation, regardless of whether it has become liquidating agent, shall be and become subrogated to all rights against the closed bank of the owners of the deposits in the same manner and to the same extent as subrogation of the corporation is provided for in subsection (1) of § 12B of the Federal Reserve Act, § 8 of the Banking Act of 1933, in the case of the closing of a national bank, and shall be generally subrogated to all rights of the depositors as provided by the laws of Tennessee; provided, that the rights of depositors and other creditors of the closed institution shall be determined in accordance with the applicable provisions of the laws of this state.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); T.C.A., § 45-503.

Compiler's Notes. Section 8 of the Banking Act of 1933 (formerly section 12B of Federal Reserve Act) is found in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1811 et seq.

45-2-804. Commissioner to furnish deposit insurance corporation copies of examinations and other information.

The commissioner may furnish to the corporation, or to any official or examiner of the corporation, a copy or copies of any or all examinations made of the bank, and of any or all reports made by same, and shall give access and disclose to the corporation, or any official or examiner of the corporation, any and all information possessed by the office of the commissioner with reference to the conditions or affairs to the insured institution.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-504.

45-2-805. Loans to closed banks — Security — Sale of assets.

With respect to any bank that is now or may hereafter be closed on account of inability to meet the demands of its depositors, or by action of the commissioner or of a court, or by action of its directors, or in the event of its insolvency or suspension, the commissioner and/or the receiver or liquidator of the institution, with the permission of the commissioner, may borrow from the federal deposit insurance corporation and pledge or mortgage any part or all of the assets of the institution to the corporation as security for a loan by it; provided, that where the corporation is acting as the receiver or liquidator, the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction shall be obtained first approving the loan. The commissioner, upon the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction, and upon a like order and with the permission of the commissioner, the receiver or liquidator of the institution may sell to the corporation any part or all of the assets of the institution.

This section shall not be construed to limit the power of any bank, the commissioner or receivers or liquidators to pledge or sell assets in accordance with any existing law.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-505.

45-2-806. Depositories of public funds exempt from security requirements to extent of deposit insurance.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the existing laws of this state that may require security for the deposit of the public funds of the state or of any political subdivision of the state or of any municipality created under the laws of the state, in the form of a surety bond, deposit of collateral or otherwise, hereafter no bank receiving the deposits shall be required to furnish any security for the deposits, to the extent that the deposits are now insured under § 8 of the Banking Act of 1933 (12 U.S.C. §§ 1811 et seq.).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.322); T.C.A., § 45-506.

Cross-References. Applicability to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.